Utah statutes.
76-10-521.   Unlawful marking of pistol or revolver.

(1)  Any person who places or stamps on any pistol or revolver any number except one assigned to it by the Department of Public Safety is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(2)  This section does not prohibit restoration by the owner of the name of the maker, model, or of the original manufacturer's number or other mark of identification when the restoration is authorized by the Department of Public Safety, nor prevent any manufacturer from placing in the ordinary course of business the name of the make, model, manufacturer's number, or other mark of identification upon a new pistol or revolver.

